Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 5. Landlord Remedies.

§ 55.1-1245.
(Effective from July 1, 2022, until the later of July 1, 2028, or seven years after the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency expires) Noncompliance with rental agreement; monetary penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if there is a material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or a violation of §

55.1-1227

materially affecting health and safety, the landlord may serve a written notice on the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and stating that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than 30 days after receipt of the notice if the breach is not remedied in 21 days and that the rental agreement shall terminate as provided in the notice.

If the breach is remediable by repairs or the payment of damages or otherwise and the tenant adequately remedies the breach prior to the date specified in the notice, the rental agreement shall not terminate.

If the tenant commits a breach that is not remediable, the landlord may serve a written notice on the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and stating that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than 30 days after receipt of the notice. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, when a breach of the tenant’s obligations under this chapter or the rental agreement involves or constitutes a criminal or a willful act that is not remediable and that poses a threat to health or safety, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement immediately and proceed to obtain possession of the premises. For purposes of this subsection, any illegal drug activity involving a controlled substance, as used or defined by the Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.), or any activity that involves or constitutes a criminal or willful act that also poses a threat to health and safety, by the tenant, an authorized occupant, or a guest or invitee of the tenant shall constitute an immediate nonremediable violation for which the landlord may proceed to terminate the tenancy without the necessity of waiting for a conviction of any criminal offense that may arise out of the same actions. In order to obtain an order of possession from a court of competent jurisdiction terminating the tenancy for illegal drug activity or for any other activity that involves or constitutes a criminal or willful act that also poses a threat to health and safety, the landlord shall prove any such violations by a preponderance of the evidence. However, where the illegal drug activity or any activity that involves or constitutes a criminal or willful act that also poses a threat to health and safety is engaged in by an authorized occupant or a guest or invitee of the tenant, the tenant shall be presumed to have knowledge of such activities unless the presumption is rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. The initial hearing on the landlord’s action for immediate possession of the premises shall be held within 15 calendar days from the date of service on the tenant; however, the court shall order an earlier hearing when emergency conditions are alleged to exist upon the premises that constitute an immediate threat to the health or safety of the other tenants. After the initial hearing, if the matter is scheduled for a subsequent hearing or for a contested trial, the court, to the extent practicable, shall order that the matter be given priority on the court’s docket. Such subsequent hearing or contested trial shall be heard no later than 30 calendar days from the date of service on the tenant. During the interim period between the date of the initial hearing and the date of any subsequent hearing or contested trial, the court may afford any further remedy or relief as is necessary to protect the interests of parties to the proceeding or the interests of any other tenant residing on the premises. Failure by the court to hold either of the hearings within the time limits set out in this section shall not be a basis for dismissal of the case.

If the tenant is a victim of family abuse as defined in § 16.1-228 that occurred in the dwelling unit or on the premises and the perpetrator is barred from the dwelling unit pursuant to §

55.1-1246

on the basis of information provided by the tenant to the landlord, or by a protective order from a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to § 16.1-253.1 or 16.1-279.1 or subsection B of §

20-103

, the lease shall not terminate solely due to an act of family abuse against the tenant. However, these provisions shall not be applicable if (i) the tenant fails to provide written documentation corroborating the tenant’s status as a victim of family abuse and the exclusion from the dwelling unit of the perpetrator no later than 21 days from the alleged offense or (ii) the perpetrator returns to the dwelling unit or the premises, in violation of a bar notice, and the tenant fails to promptly notify the landlord within 24 hours that the perpetrator has returned to the dwelling unit or the premises, unless the tenant proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the tenant had no actual knowledge that the perpetrator violated the bar notice, or it was not possible for the tenant to notify the landlord within 24 hours, in which case the tenant shall promptly notify the landlord, but in no event later than seven days. If the provisions of this subsection are not applicable, the tenant shall remain responsible for the acts of the other co-tenants, authorized occupants, or guests or invitees pursuant to §

55.1-1227

and is subject to termination of the tenancy pursuant to the lease and this chapter.

If the tenant has been served with a prior written notice that required the tenant to remedy a breach, and the tenant remedied such breach, where the tenant intentionally commits a subsequent breach of a like nature as the prior breach, the landlord may serve a written notice on the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the subsequent breach, make reference to the prior breach of a like nature, and state that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than 30 days after receipt of the notice.

If rent is unpaid when due, and the tenant fails to pay rent within five days after written notice is served on him notifying the tenant of his nonpayment, and of the landlord’s intention to terminate the rental agreement if the rent is not paid within the five-day period, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement and proceed to obtain possession of the premises as provided in §

55.1-1251

. If a check for rent is delivered to the landlord drawn on an account with insufficient funds, or if an electronic funds transfer has been rejected because of insufficient funds or a stop-payment order has been placed in bad faith by the authorizing party, and the tenant fails to pay rent within five days after written notice is served on him notifying the tenant of his nonpayment and of the landlord’s intention to terminate the rental agreement if the rent is not paid by cash, cashier’s check, certified check, or a completed electronic funds transfer within the five-day period, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement and proceed to obtain possession of the premises as provided in §

55.1-1251

. Nothing shall be construed to prevent a landlord from seeking an award of costs or attorney fees under §

8.01-27.1

or civil recovery under §

8.01-27.2

, as a part of other damages requested on the unlawful detainer filed pursuant to §

8.01-126

, provided that the landlord has given notice in accordance with §

55.1-1202

, which notice may be included in the five-day termination notice provided in accordance with this section.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the landlord may recover damages and obtain injunctive relief for any noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or §

55.1-1227

. In the event of a breach of the rental agreement or noncompliance by the tenant, the landlord shall be entitled to recover from the tenant the following, regardless of whether a lawsuit is filed or an order is obtained from a court: (i) rent due and owing as contracted for in the rental agreement, (ii) other charges and fees as contracted for in the rental agreement, (iii) late charges contracted for in the rental agreement, (iv) reasonable attorney fees as contracted for in the rental agreement or as provided by law, (v) costs of the proceeding as contracted for in the rental agreement or as provided by law only if court action has been filed, and (vi) damages to the dwelling unit or premises as contracted for in the rental agreement.

In a case where a lawsuit is pending before the court upon a breach of the rental agreement or noncompliance by the tenant and the landlord prevails, the court shall award a money judgment to the landlord and against the tenant for the relief requested, which may include the following: (i) rent due and owing as of the court date as contracted for in the rental agreement; (ii) other charges and fees as contracted for in the rental agreement; (iii) late charges contracted for in the rental agreement; (iv) reasonable attorney fees as contracted for in the rental agreement or as provided by law, unless in any such action the tenant proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the tenant’s failure to pay rent or vacate was reasonable; (v) costs of the proceeding as contracted for in the rental agreement or as provided by law; and (vi) damages to the dwelling unit or premises.

A landlord who owns more than four rental dwelling units or more than a 10 percent interest in more than four rental dwelling units, whether individually or through a business entity, in the Commonwealth, shall not take any adverse action, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(k), against an applicant for tenancy based solely on payment history or an eviction for nonpayment of rent that occurred during the period beginning on March 12, 2020, and ending 30 days after the expiration or revocation of any state of emergency declared by the Governor elated to the COVID-19 pandemic.
I. 1. A landlord who owns more than four rental dwelling units or more than a 10 percent interest in more than four rental dwelling units, whether individually or through a business entity, in the Commonwealth, shall not take any adverse action, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(k), against an applicant for tenancy based solely on payment history or an eviction for nonpayment of rent that occurred during the period beginning on March 12, 2020, and ending 30 days after the expiration or revocation of any state of emergency declared by the Governor elated to the COVID-19 pandemic.

If such a landlord denies an applicant for tenancy, then the landlord shall provide to the applicant written notice of the denial and of the applicant’s right to assert that his failure to qualify was based upon payment history or an eviction based on nonpayment of rent that occurred during the period beginning on March 12, 2020, and ending 30 days after the expiration or revocation of any state of emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic. The written notice of denial shall include the statewide legal aid telephone number and website address and shall inform the applicant that he must assert his right to challenge the denial within seven days of the postmark date. If the landlord does not receive a response from the applicant within seven days of the postmark date, the landlord may proceed. If, in addition to the written notice, the landlord provides notice to the applicant by electronic or telephonic means using an email address, telephone number, or other contact information provided by the applicant informing the applicant of his denial and right to assert that his failure to qualify was based upon payment history or an eviction based on nonpayment of rent that occurred during the period beginning on March 12, 2020, and ending 30 days after the expiration or revocation of any state of emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic and the tenant does not make such assertion that the failure to qualify was the result of such payment history or eviction prior to the close of business on the next business day, the landlord may proceed. The landlord must be able to validate the date and time that any communication sent by electronic or telephonic means was sent to the applicant. If a landlord does receive a response from the applicant asserting such a right, and the landlord relied upon a consumer or tenant screening report, the landlord shall make a good faith effort to contact the generator of the report to ascertain whether such determination was due solely to the applicant for tenancy’s payment history or an eviction for nonpayment that occurred during the period beginning on March 12, 2020, and ending 30 days after the expiration or revocation of any state of emergency declared by the Governor related to the COVID-19 pandemic. If the landlord does not receive a response from the generator of the report within three business days of requesting the information, the landlord may proceed with using the information from the report without additional action.

If such a landlord does not comply with the provisions of this subsection, the applicant for tenancy may recover statutory damages of $1,000, along with attorney fees.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.31; 1978, c. 378; 1980, c. 502; 1982, c. 260; 1984, c. 78; 1987, c. 387; 1988, c. 62; 1989, c. 301; 1995, c. 580; 2000, c. 760; 2003, c. 363; 2004, c. 232; 2005, cc. 808, 883; 2006, cc. 628, 717; 2007, c. 273; 2008, c. 489; 2013, c. 563; 2014, c. 813; 2017, c. 730; 2019, c. 712; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 46, 47.

Section set out three times.

The section above is effective July 1, 2022, until the later of July 1, 2028, or 7 years after the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency expires. For the version effective until July 1, 2022, see the preceding version and for the version of this section effective the later of July 1, 2028, or 7 years after the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency expires, see the following section, also numbered
§

55.1-1245

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 46,
cl. 2, as amended by Acts
2021 Sp. Sess. I, c. 492, cl. 1,
provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2022.” Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 54, which made identical amendments and contained an identical cl. 2, as Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 46, was not extended and has since expired.

Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 47, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire either seven years after the expiration of any state of emergency declared by the Governor related to the COVID-19 pandemic or on July 1, 2028, whichever is later.”

Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 49, cl. 1, effective November 9, 2020, provides: “§ 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any tenant as defined in
§

55.1-1200

of the Code of Virginia who is a defendant in an unlawful detainer for nonpayment of rent pursuant to
§

55.1-1245

of the Code of Virginia for rent due during the Emergency seeking a judgment for the payment of money or possession of the premises shall be granted a 60-day continuance of such unlawful detainer action from the initial court date if the tenant appears on such court date and provides written proof that he was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any homeowner who, during the Emergency, defaults on a note that is secured by a one-family to four-family residential property located in the Commonwealth and is subject to a foreclosure proceeding on any mortgage or to the execution of or sale under any deed of trust shall be granted a 30-day stay of such proceeding if the homeowner, within 90 days of the initial declaration of the Emergency or 90 days following the end of the Emergency, whichever is later, requests a stay and provides written proof to his lender that he was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any owner who rents a residential dwelling unit located in the Commonwealth to a tenant as defined in
§

55.1-1200

of the Code of Virginia and who, during the Emergency, defaults on a note that is secured by such dwelling unit and is subject to a foreclosure proceeding on any mortgage or to the execution of or sale under any deed of trust shall be granted a 30-day stay of such proceeding if the owner, within 90 days of the initial declaration of the Emergency or 90 days following the end of the Emergency, whichever is later, requests a stay and provides written proof to his lender that his tenant was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 4. Homeowners and owners shall be excluded from the provisions of this act if they are subject to protection from foreclosure under the provisions of a federal, state, or local law, regulation, or action enacted in response to the COVID-19 pandemic or the Emergency.

“§ 5. Any continuance of a stay period provided by this act shall be tolled during the period of any judicial emergency declared pursuant to
§

17.1-330

of the Code of Virginia due to the Emergency.

“§ 6. The 60-day continuance provided by this act shall run concurrently with any period of eviction protection provided by any other state or federal law.

“§ 7. For the purposes of this act:

“ ‘Affected by’ means to experience a loss of income, whether partial or complete, from a public or private source due to the Emergency, such that the affected party must request a stay or continuance, as applicable, by providing written proof to a court or lender, as applicable, stating that as a result of the Emergency he is (i) not currently receiving wages or payments or (ii) receiving reduced wages or payments from a public or private source.

“ ‘Emergency’ means the state of emergency declared by the Governor in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

“ ‘Written proof’ means (i) a paystub showing reduced earnings for a pay period during the period of the Emergency in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, (ii) a copy of a furlough notification letter or essential employee status letter indicating the employee’s status as nonessential due to the Emergency, or (iii) any other documentation deemed appropriate by a court or lender.”

Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 49, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire 90 days following the end of a state of emergency declared by the Governor in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.”

Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 49, cl. 1, effective November 9, 2020, provides: “§ 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any tenant as defined in
§

55.1-1200

of the Code of Virginia who is a defendant in an unlawful detainer for nonpayment of rent pursuant to
§

55.1-1245

of the Code of Virginia for rent due during the Emergency seeking a judgment for the payment of money or possession of the premises shall be granted a 60-day continuance of such unlawful detainer action from the initial court date if the tenant appears on such court date and provides written proof that he was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any homeowner who, during the Emergency, defaults on a note that is secured by a one-family to four-family residential property located in the Commonwealth and is subject to a foreclosure proceeding on any mortgage or to the execution of or sale under any deed of trust shall be granted a 30-day stay of such proceeding if the homeowner, within 90 days of the initial declaration of the Emergency or 90 days following the end of the Emergency, whichever is later, requests a stay and provides written proof to his lender that he was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any owner who rents a residential dwelling unit located in the Commonwealth to a tenant as defined in
§

55.1-1200

of the Code of Virginia and who, during the Emergency, defaults on a note that is secured by such dwelling unit and is subject to a foreclosure proceeding on any mortgage or to the execution of or sale under any deed of trust shall be granted a 30-day stay of such proceeding if the owner, within 90 days of the initial declaration of the Emergency or 90 days following the end of the Emergency, whichever is later, requests a stay and provides written proof to his lender that his tenant was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 4. Homeowners and owners shall be excluded from the provisions of this act if they are subject to protection from foreclosure under the provisions of a federal, state, or local law, regulation, or action enacted in response to the COVID-19 pandemic or the Emergency.

“§ 5. Any continuance of a stay period provided by this act shall be tolled during the period of any judicial emergency declared pursuant to
§

17.1-330

of the Code of Virginia due to the Emergency.

“§ 6. The 60-day continuance provided by this act shall run concurrently with any period of eviction protection provided by any other state or federal law.

“§ 7. For the purposes of this act:

“ ‘Affected by’ means to experience a loss of income, whether partial or complete, from a public or private source due to the Emergency, such that the affected party must request a stay or continuance, as applicable, by providing written proof to a court or lender, as applicable, stating that as a result of the Emergency he is (i) not currently receiving wages or payments or (ii) receiving reduced wages or payments from a public or private source.

“ ‘Emergency’ means the state of emergency declared by the Governor in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

“ ‘Written proof’ means (i) a paystub showing reduced earnings for a pay period during the period of the Emergency in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, (ii) a copy of a furlough notification letter or essential employee status letter indicating the employee’s status as nonessential due to the Emergency, or (iii) any other documentation deemed appropriate by a court or lender.”

Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 49, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire 90 days following the end of a state of emergency declared by the Governor in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 46 and 54, effective November 9, 2020, are identical and in subsection F, inserted “For a landlord who owns four or fewer rental dwelling units,” substituted “14 days” for “five days” and “14-day” for “five-day” and inserted the second paragraph; inserted the subsection G designation; and
redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 47, effective March 1, 2021, added subsection J. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 47, effective March 1, 2021, added subsection J. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

Cross references.

As to judgment to be given in action upon contract or note where defendant appears and denies claim under oath, see §

8.01-28

. As to procedure when plaintiff sues on sworn claim, see § 16.1-88.

§ 55.1-1245.
(Effective the later of July 1, 2028, or 7 years after the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency expires) Noncompliance with rental agreement; monetary penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if there is a material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or a violation of §

55.1-1227

materially affecting health and safety, the landlord may serve a written notice on the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and stating that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than 30 days after receipt of the notice if the breach is not remedied in 21 days and that the rental agreement shall terminate as provided in the notice.

If the breach is remediable by repairs or the payment of damages or otherwise and the tenant adequately remedies the breach prior to the date specified in the notice, the rental agreement shall not terminate.

If the tenant commits a breach that is not remediable, the landlord may serve a written notice on the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and stating that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than 30 days after receipt of the notice. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, when a breach of the tenant’s obligations under this chapter or the rental agreement involves or constitutes a criminal or a willful act that is not remediable and that poses a threat to health or safety, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement immediately and proceed to obtain possession of the premises. For purposes of this subsection, any illegal drug activity involving a controlled substance, as used or defined by the Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.), or any activity that involves or constitutes a criminal or willful act that also poses a threat to health and safety, by the tenant, an authorized occupant, or a guest or invitee of the tenant shall constitute an immediate nonremediable violation for which the landlord may proceed to terminate the tenancy without the necessity of waiting for a conviction of any criminal offense that may arise out of the same actions. In order to obtain an order of possession from a court of competent jurisdiction terminating the tenancy for illegal drug activity or for any other activity that involves or constitutes a criminal or willful act that also poses a threat to health and safety, the landlord shall prove any such violations by a preponderance of the evidence. However, where the illegal drug activity or any activity that involves or constitutes a criminal or willful act that also poses a threat to health and safety is engaged in by an authorized occupant or a guest or invitee of the tenant, the tenant shall be presumed to have knowledge of such activities unless the presumption is rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. The initial hearing on the landlord’s action for immediate possession of the premises shall be held within 15 calendar days from the date of service on the tenant; however, the court shall order an earlier hearing when emergency conditions are alleged to exist upon the premises that constitute an immediate threat to the health or safety of the other tenants. After the initial hearing, if the matter is scheduled for a subsequent hearing or for a contested trial, the court, to the extent practicable, shall order that the matter be given priority on the court’s docket. Such subsequent hearing or contested trial shall be heard no later than 30 calendar days from the date of service on the tenant. During the interim period between the date of the initial hearing and the date of any subsequent hearing or contested trial, the court may afford any further remedy or relief as is necessary to protect the interests of parties to the proceeding or the interests of any other tenant residing on the premises. Failure by the court to hold either of the hearings within the time limits set out in this section shall not be a basis for dismissal of the case.

If the tenant is a victim of family abuse as defined in § 16.1-228 that occurred in the dwelling unit or on the premises and the perpetrator is barred from the dwelling unit pursuant to §

55.1-1246

on the basis of information provided by the tenant to the landlord, or by a protective order from a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to § 16.1-253.1 or 16.1-279.1 or subsection B of §

20-103

, the lease shall not terminate solely due to an act of family abuse against the tenant. However, these provisions shall not be applicable if (i) the tenant fails to provide written documentation corroborating the tenant’s status as a victim of family abuse and the exclusion from the dwelling unit of the perpetrator no later than 21 days from the alleged offense or (ii) the perpetrator returns to the dwelling unit or the premises, in violation of a bar notice, and the tenant fails to promptly notify the landlord within 24 hours that the perpetrator has returned to the dwelling unit or the premises, unless the tenant proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the tenant had no actual knowledge that the perpetrator violated the bar notice, or it was not possible for the tenant to notify the landlord within 24 hours, in which case the tenant shall promptly notify the landlord, but in no event later than seven days. If the provisions of this subsection are not applicable, the tenant shall remain responsible for the acts of the other co-tenants, authorized occupants, or guests or invitees pursuant to §

55.1-1227

and is subject to termination of the tenancy pursuant to the lease and this chapter.

If the tenant has been served with a prior written notice that required the tenant to remedy a breach, and the tenant remedied such breach, where the tenant intentionally commits a subsequent breach of a like nature as the prior breach, the landlord may serve a written notice on the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the subsequent breach, make reference to the prior breach of a like nature, and state that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than 30 days after receipt of the notice.

If rent is unpaid when due, and the tenant fails to pay rent within five days after written notice is served on him notifying the tenant of his nonpayment, and of the landlord’s intention to terminate the rental agreement if the rent is not paid within the five-day period, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement and proceed to obtain possession of the premises as provided in §

55.1-1251

. If a check for rent is delivered to the landlord drawn on an account with insufficient funds, or if an electronic funds transfer has been rejected because of insufficient funds or a stop-payment order has been placed in bad faith by the authorizing party, and the tenant fails to pay rent within five days after written notice is served on him notifying the tenant of his nonpayment and of the landlord’s intention to terminate the rental agreement if the rent is not paid by cash, cashier’s check, certified check, or a completed electronic funds transfer within the five-day period, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement and proceed to obtain possession of the premises as provided in §

55.1-1251

. Nothing shall be construed to prevent a landlord from seeking an award of costs or attorney fees under §

8.01-27.1

or civil recovery under §

8.01-27.2

, as a part of other damages requested on the unlawful detainer filed pursuant to §

8.01-126

, provided that the landlord has given notice in accordance with §

55.1-1202

, which notice may be included in the five-day termination notice provided in accordance with this section.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the landlord may recover damages and obtain injunctive relief for any noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or §

55.1-1227

. In the event of a breach of the rental agreement or noncompliance by the tenant, the landlord shall be entitled to recover from the tenant the following, regardless of whether a lawsuit is filed or an order is obtained from a court: (i) rent due and owing as contracted for in the rental agreement, (ii) other charges and fees as contracted for in the rental agreement, (iii) late charges contracted for in the rental agreement, (iv) reasonable attorney fees as contracted for in the rental agreement or as provided by law, (v) costs of the proceeding as contracted for in the rental agreement or as provided by law only if court action has been filed, and (vi) damages to the dwelling unit or premises as contracted for in the rental agreement.

In a case where a lawsuit is pending before the court upon a breach of the rental agreement or noncompliance by the tenant and the landlord prevails, the court shall award a money judgment to the landlord and against the tenant for the relief requested, which may include the following: (i) rent due and owing as of the court date as contracted for in the rental agreement; (ii) other charges and fees as contracted for in the rental agreement; (iii) late charges contracted for in the rental agreement; (iv) reasonable attorney fees as contracted for in the rental agreement or as provided by law, unless in any such action the tenant proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the tenant’s failure to pay rent or vacate was reasonable; (v) costs of the proceeding as contracted for in the rental agreement or as provided by law; and (vi) damages to the dwelling unit or premises.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.31; 1978, c. 378; 1980, c. 502; 1982, c. 260; 1984, c. 78; 1987, c. 387; 1988, c. 62; 1989, c. 301; 1995, c. 580; 2000, c. 760; 2003, c. 363; 2004, c. 232; 2005, cc. 808, 883; 2006, cc. 628, 717; 2007, c. 273; 2008, c. 489; 2013, c. 563; 2014, c. 813; 2017, c. 730; 2019, c. 712; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 47.

Section set out three times.

The section above is
effective the later of July 1, 2028, or 7 years after the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency expires. For the version effective until July 1, 2022, see the first version of this section and for the version of this section effective July 1, 2022 until the later of July 1, 2028, or 7 years after the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency expires, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

55.1-1245

.

§ 55.1-1246.
Barring guest or invitee of a tenant.

A guest or invitee of a tenant may be barred from the premises by the landlord upon written notice served personally upon the guest or invitee of the tenant for conduct on the landlord’s property where the premises are located that violates the terms and conditions of the rental agreement, a local ordinance, or a state or federal law. A copy of the notice shall be served upon the tenant in accordance with this chapter. The notice shall describe the conduct of the guest or invitee that is the basis for the landlord’s action.

In addition to the remedies against the tenant authorized by this chapter, a landlord may apply to the magistrate for a warrant for trespass, provided that the guest or invitee has been served in accordance with subsection A.

The tenant may file a tenant’s assertion, in accordance with §

55.1-1244

, requesting that the general district court review the landlord’s action to bar the guest or invitee.

History.

1999, cc. 359, 390, § 55-248.31:01; 2000, c. 760; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1247.
Sheriffs authorized to serve certain notices; fee for service.

The sheriff of any county or city, upon request, may deliver any notice to a tenant on behalf of a landlord or lessor under the provisions of §

55.1-1245

or

55.1-1415

. For this service, the sheriff shall be allowed a fee not to exceed $12.

History.

1981, c. 148, § 55-248.31:1; 1995, c. 51; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1248.
Remedy by repair, etc.; emergencies.

If there is a violation by the tenant of §

55.1-1227

or the rental agreement materially affecting health and safety that can be remedied by repair, replacement of a damaged item, or cleaning, the landlord shall send a written notice to the tenant specifying the breach and stating that the landlord will enter the dwelling unit and perform the work in a workmanlike manner and submit an itemized bill for the actual and reasonable cost for such work to the tenant, which shall be due as rent on the next rent due date or, if the rental agreement has terminated, for immediate payment.

In case of emergency the landlord may, as promptly as conditions require, enter the dwelling unit, perform the work in a workmanlike manner, and submit an itemized bill for the actual and reasonable cost for such work to the tenant, which shall be due as rent on the next rent due date or, if the rental agreement has terminated, for immediate payment.

The landlord may perform the repair, replacement, or cleaning or may engage a third party to do so.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.32; 2000, c. 760; 2009, c. 663; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1249.
Remedies for absence, nonuse, and abandonment.

If the rental agreement requires the tenant to give notice to the landlord of an anticipated extended absence in excess of seven days and the tenant fails to do so, the landlord may recover actual damages from the tenant. During any absence of the tenant in excess of seven days, the landlord may enter the dwelling unit at times reasonably necessary to protect his possessions and property. The rental agreement is deemed to be terminated by the landlord as of the date of abandonment by the tenant. If the landlord cannot determine whether the premises has been abandoned by the tenant, the landlord shall serve written notice on the tenant in accordance with §

55.1-1202

requiring the tenant to give written notice to the landlord within seven days that the tenant intends to remain in occupancy of the premises. If the tenant gives such written notice to the landlord, or if the landlord otherwise determines that the tenant remains in occupancy of the premises, the landlord shall not treat the premises as having been abandoned. Unless the landlord receives written notice from the tenant or otherwise determines that the tenant remains in occupancy of the premises, upon the expiration of seven days from the date of the landlord’s notice to the tenant, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the premises has been abandoned by the tenant, and the rental agreement shall be deemed to terminate on that date. The landlord shall mitigate damages in accordance with §

55.1-1251

.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.33; 2002, c. 761; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.